Idaho statutes. Title 22 AGRICULTURE AND HORTICULTURE
Chapter 44
IDAHO AQUACULTURE COMMISSION

Sec.

§ 22-4401. Legislative intent. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-4401, as added by 2004, ch. 350, § 1, p. 1042.

§ 22-4402. Definitions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-4402, as added by 2004, ch. 350, § 1, p. 1042.

§ 22-4403. Idaho aquaculture commission — Established — Composition — Qualification of members

Meetings. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-4403, as added by 2004, ch. 350, § 1, p. 1042.

§ 22-4404. Powers and duties. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-4404, as added by 2004, ch. 350, § 1, p. 1042.

§ 22-4405. Deposit and disbursement of funds — Audits

Reports. Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-4405, as added by 2004, ch. 350, § 1, p. 1042.

§ 22-4406. State not liable. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-4406, as added by 2004, ch. 350, § 1, p. 1042.

§ 22-4407. Assessments. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-4407, as added by 2004, ch. 350, § 1, p. 1042.

§ 22-4408. Refunds. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-4408, as added by 2004, ch. 350, § 1, p. 1042.

§ 22-4409. Opt out alternative. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-4409, as added by 2004, ch. 350, § 1, p. 1042.